Connecticut, session 2026, HB05202.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars be
appropriated to Continuum of Care, Inc. from the General Fund, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the operation of the emergency
housing program.